Hawaii statutes.
[§481X-9] Applicability of premium taxes.
Service contract provider fees shall not be subject to premium taxes.
Contractual liability insurance policies shall be subject to premium taxes. [L
2000, c 221, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next